Tennessee, session 114, SB0267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-29-122(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c)
(1) A collection station operated by a medical laboratory owner that is a
licensee of a medical laboratory in this state does not require an additional
license, without regard to where specimens collected at the medical laboratory
owner's collection stations are transported, as long as the medical laboratory
owner of the licensed medical laboratory retains ownership of the medical
laboratory and oversight of the collection stations.
(2) A collection station operated by a person who is not a medical
laboratory owner that is a licensee of a medical laboratory located in this state
must have a license issued by the board.
(3) All collection stations must comply with rules prescribed by the board.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0267
001884
- 1 -